Utah statutes.
78B-5-826.   Attorney fees -- Reciprocal rights to recover attorney fees.

A court may award costs and attorney fees to either party that prevails in a civil action based upon any promissory note, written contract, or other writing executed after April 28, 1986, when the provisions of the promissory note, written contract, or other writing allow at least one party to recover attorney fees.

